District of Columbia statutes.
42-2134

Submission of affordable housing data by affordable housing developments.

The Mayor shall include in the Affordable Housing Inventory an affordable housing development that does not receive financing, subsidy, funding, or some form of financial assistance from the District of Columbia or federal government to provide a unit of affordable housing, if the affordable housing development requests inclusion in the Affordable Housing Inventory and submits the information required by § 42-2135 to the Mayor, or the Mayor’s designee, on a quarterly basis.

History

Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-215, § 5, 55 DCR 7494